California, session 20252026, SB313.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 102425 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102425. (a) The certificate of live birth shall contain those items necessary to establish the fact of the birth and shall contain only the following information:(1) Full name and sex of the child.(2) Date of birth, including month, day, hour, and year.(3) Place of birth.(4) Full name and date of birth of each parent, including month, day, and year, and the parental relationship of the parent to the child.(A) The full name of the mother shall be the birth name of the mother.(B) If the birth mother is one of the parents listed on the certificate of live birth, the birth mother’s name shall be placed on the second parent line.(C) If the parents are not married to each other, the name of the person identified by the woman giving birth as either the only possible genetic parent other than the woman giving birth or the intended parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction shall not be listed on the birth certificate unless the woman who gave birth to the child and either the only possible genetic parent other than the woman who gave birth or the intended parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction sign a voluntary declaration of parentage at the hospital before the birth certificate is submitted for registration. The birth certificate may be amended to add another parent’s name at a later date only if parentage for the child has been established by a judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction or by the filing of a voluntary declaration of parentage.(5) Multiple births and birth order of multiple births.(6) Signature, and relationship to the child, of a parent or other informant, and date signed.(7) Name, title, and mailing address of the attending physician and surgeon or principal attendant, signature, and certification of live birth by the attending physician and surgeon or principal attendant or certifier, date signed, and name and title of the certifier, if other than the attending physician and surgeon or principal attendant.(8) Date accepted for registration and signature of local registrar.(9) A state birth certificate number and local registration district and number.(10) A blank space for entry of the date of death with a caption reading “Date of Death.”(b) In addition to the items listed in subdivision (a), the certificate of live birth shall contain the following medical and social information, provided that the information is kept confidential pursuant to Sections 102430 and 102447 and is clearly labeled “Confidential Information for Public Health Use Only:”(1) Birth weight.(2) Pregnancy history.(3) Race and ethnicity of the mother and any other parent.(4) Residence address of the birth mother.(5) A blank space for entry of census tract for the birth mother’s address.(6) Date of first prenatal care visit, the number of prenatal care visits, and commencing January 1, 2007, the date of last prenatal care visit.(7) Date of last normal menses and, commencing January 1, 2007, an obstetric estimate of completed weeks of gestation at delivery.(8) Description of complications and procedures of pregnancy and concurrent illnesses, congenital malformation, and any complication or procedure of labor and delivery, including surgery, provided that this information is essential medical information and appears in total on the face of the certificate.(9) Commencing January 1, 2007, hearing screen results.(10) The occupations of the mother and father or parent and kind of business or industry.(11) Education level of the mother and father or parent.(12) Principal source of payment for prenatal care, which shall include the following: Medi-Cal, private insurance, self-pay, other sources, and any other categories determined by the State Department of Public Health.(13) Expected principal source of payment for delivery, which shall include the following: Medi-Cal, private insurance, self-pay, other sources, and any other categories determined by the State Department of Public Health.(14) An indication of whether or not the child’s parent desires the automatic issuance of a social security number to the child.(15) On and after January 1, 1995, the social security numbers of the mother and father or parent, unless subdivision (d) applies.(16) Commencing July 1, 2027, the birthplace of each parent.(c) When an objection is made by either parent to the furnishing of the information specified in paragraphs (3), (10), and (11) of subdivision (b) for the confidential portion of the certificate of live birth, this information shall not be required to be entered on that portion of the certificate of live birth.(d) A parent is not required to disclose the parent’s social security number as required by paragraph (15) of subdivision (b) if the parent has good cause for not disclosing the parent’s social security number. Good cause shall be defined by regulations adopted by the Department of Child Support Services.(e) Paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) shall be completed by the attending physician and surgeon or the attending physician and surgeon’s designated representative. The names and addresses of children born with congenital malformations who require followup treatment, as determined by the child’s physician and surgeon, shall be furnished by the physician and surgeon to the local health officer, if permission is granted by either parent of the child.(f) The parent shall only be asked to sign the form after both the public portion and the confidential medical and social information items have been entered upon the certificate of live birth.(g) (1) The State Registrar shall instruct all local registrars to collect the information specified in this section with respect to certificates of live birth. The information shall be transcribed on the certificate of live birth in use at the time and shall be limited to the information specified in this section.(2) Information relating to concurrent illnesses, complications and procedures of pregnancy and delivery, and congenital malformations shall be completed by the physician and surgeon, or the physician and surgeon’s designee, who shall insert in the space provided on the confidential portion of the certificate the appropriate number or numbers listed on the VS-10A supplemental worksheet. The VS-10A supplemental form shall be used as a worksheet only and shall not in any manner be linked with the identity of the child or the birth mother, nor submitted with the certificate to the State Registrar. All information transferred from the worksheet to the certificate shall be fully explained to the parent or other informant prior to the signing of the certificate. Questions relating to drug or alcohol abuse shall not be asked.(h) (1) The Vital Statistics Advisory Committee, in accordance with Section 102465, shall conduct a review of the contents of the certificate of live birth to coincide with decennial revisions by the National Center for Health Statistics to the United States Standard Certificate of Live Birth. The Vital Statistics Advisory Committee shall make recommendations to the State Registrar regarding the adoption of modifications to the state certificate of live birth that are similar to those made to the federal certificate.(2) Notwithstanding Section 102470, the State Registrar shall review the Vital Statistics Advisory Committee recommendations and, at the State Registrar’s discretion, shall submit to the Legislature, for approval, additions or deletions to the certificate of live birth.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which amends Section 102425 of the Health and Safety Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect the privacy of persons with regard to information about the birthplace of their parents, except for access by authorized entities or individuals for health-related or other limited purposes as specified in Section 102430 of the Health and Safety Code, it is necessary that this act limit the public’s right of access to that information.